apertium-kir-uzb.kir.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-OSOL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:го # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндо PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндон PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндой PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндогу DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-USUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндагы DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-AL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нын # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндагы DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндыктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ны POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TIGIL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нин # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ни # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нде PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нден PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:нндей PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндеги DAGI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ни POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-EN

%<nom%>:ен PRED ;
%<gen%>:енин # ;
%<acc%>:ени # ;
%<dat%>:ага # ;
%<dat%>:аңа # ;   ! Dir/LR
%<dat%>:аа # ;    ! Dir/LR
%<loc%>:енде PRED ;
%<abl%>:енден PRED ;
%<sim%>:ендей PRED ;
%<loc%>:ендеги DAGI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-IZ

%<nom%>: PRED ;
%<gen%>:ди # ;
%<acc%>:дин # ;
%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<loc%>:де PRED ;
%<abl%>:ден PRED ;
%<sim%>:дей PRED ;
%<loc%>:деги DAGI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AL

%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<gen%>:ны # ;
%<acc%>:нын # ;
%<dat%>:га # ;
%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;
%<loc%>:ндагы DAGI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PLURALS

%<nom%>: PRED ;
%<gen%>:%>д%{I%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>д%{I%}н # ;
%<dat%>:%>г%{A%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>д%{A%} PRED ;
%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;
%<sim%>:%>д%{A%}й PRED ;
%<loc%>:%>д%{A%}г%{I%} DAGI ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG

!%<prn%>%<itg%>: CASES  ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;  ! e.g., өздөрүн

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<ind%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-POSS

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM

%<prn%>%<dem%>: POSSESSION ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;


LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<qnt%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;


LEXICON PRN-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-RECIP

!%<prn%>%<recip%>: CASES ;
%<prn%>%<recip%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-COLL   ! "Collective"(?) pronouns

! %<prn%>%<coll%>: POSSESSION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;


LEXICON PRED
V-PERS-COP ;
V-CLIT ;  ! TODO: I guess these aren't technically necessary?
# ;       ! TODO: .. since they're included in V-PERS-COP



LEXICON V-CLIT-BI

!! Modal/discourse particles
!!!!! %+бы%<qst%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} V-PERS-COP ; ! CHECK  !! CAUSING LOOPS!
%+бы%<qst%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} # ;
%+чы%<qst%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;

LEXICON V-CLIT-OTHER

%+беле%<qst%>:% беле # ;
%+бекен%<qst%>:% бекен # ;
!%+чы%<mod_foc%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;
%+чы%<qst%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;
%+го%<mod_ass%>:% го # ;
%+да%<mod_tru%>:% да # ;
%+дыр%<mod_ind%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р # ;   ! FIXME: twol size acts like this is causative
!%го%<mod_ass%>:го # ;
!%да%<mod_tru%>:да # ;
# ;

LEXICON V-CLIT 

V-CLIT-OTHER ;
V-CLIT-BI ;

! LEXICON V-PERS-POSS ! P_2
! 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>м PRED ; 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>ң PRED ; 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>ң%{I%}з PRED ; 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{S%}%{I%} PRED ; 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%б%{I%}з PRED ; 
! @D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%ң%{A%}р PRED ;  
! @D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р PRED ;  
! %<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%} PRED ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ;    ! P3 forms are null and look stupid
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
!%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ; ! P3 forms are null and look stupid

LEXICON V-PERS-COP ! P_3

!%+э%<cop%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOSG3 ; 
%+э%<cop%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 
!%+э%<cop%>%<neg%>:% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 
!%+э%<cop%>%<evid%>:% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 
!%+э%<cop%>%<neg%>%<evid%>:% эмес% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST ! P_4

@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}м V-CLIT ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң V-CLIT ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@ V-CLIT ;  
@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}к V-CLIT ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COND ! P_4
! Really these should allow деле, да, дагы, etc. afterwards
!  .. but maybe those are best allowed to be their own words :)

@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}м # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@ # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}к # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р # ;
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ;  

LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6

@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>м V-CLIT ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.NEG.1@%> V-CLIT-BI ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
@D.NEG.1@%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:@D.NEG.1@%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ; 

!LEXICON V-PERS-IMPER ! P_6


LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON

V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;
@P.NEG.1@:%>%{I%}ш@P.NEG.1@ V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ; ! Dir/LR
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND

V-INFL-FINITE ;
@D.NEG.1@:@D.NEG.1@ V-INFL-NON-FINITE ; 

%<asif%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;
%<asif%>%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE

V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;

LEXICON Numerals 
бир:бирөө PRON-COLL ;
эки:экөө PRON-COLL ;
үч:үчөө PRON-COLL ;
төрт:төртөө PRON-COLL ;
беш:бешөө PRON-COLL ;
алты:алтоо PRON-COLL ;
жети:жетөө PRON-COLL ;
